Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4603
Remedies for noncompliance.

In addition to other remedies under the law of this state other than the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act, if a court finds that a party to a proceeding under the act has acted in bad faith or intentionally failed to comply with the act or a court order issued under the act, the court may assess reasonable attorney's fees and costs against the party and order other appropriate relief.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 3.